Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.310

Annual certification of assessed valuation.

It shall be the duty of the assessor of each county lying wholly or partially within the district to certify annually to the board the aggregate assessed valuation of all taxable property in his or her county situated in any mosquito control district as the same appears from the last assessment roll of his or her county.

[ 2011 c 336 s 469; 1957 c 153 s 31.]